Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.905

Hazing—Prevention committee.

Each public institution of higher education shall establish a hazing prevention committee to promote and address hazing prevention. The committee shall have a minimum of six members including a designated chair appointed by the president of the institution. Fifty percent of the committee positions shall include students currently attending the higher education institution with at least one position filled by a student from a student organization, athletic team, or living group. The other fifty percent of the committee positions shall include at least one faculty or staff member and one parent or legal guardian of a student currently enrolled at the institution. Student input shall be considered for committee membership. A student who is a member of a student organization, athletic team, or living group that was affiliated with a finding of a hazing violation within the last twelve months may not participate in or be a member of the hazing prevention committee.

[ 2022 c 209 s 3.]

NOTES:

Short title—2022 c 209: See note following RCW 28B.10.900.